Hawaii statutes.
§171-43 Lease of campsites or sites for
youth athletic and/or educational activities. The board of land and
natural resources may directly lease without recourse to public auction to any
eleemosynary or religious organization campsites or sites for youth athletic
and/or educational activities in a state park area or on lands under the
control of the department of land and natural resources at nominal
consideration. Where the lease is for campsites, the lease shall provide that
the lessee shall permit the public to use the campsites at the rates approved
by the board in its rules and regulations. Except as provided herein, the
terms and conditions of sections 171-33, 171-35 and 171-36 shall apply. [L
1963, c 203, §1; am L 1965, c 239, §22; Supp, §103A-42.5; HRS §171-43; am L
1971, c 83, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next